Vermont, session 2025-2026, H714.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 269 is added to read:
§ 269. AUTOMATED EMPLOYMENT DECISION-MAKING TOOL
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 2 of 8
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Automated employment decision-making tool” means any software
that uses algorithms, computational models, or artificial intelligence
techniques, or a combination thereof, to materially automate or replace human
decision making regarding employment, including wages and other
compensation, hiring, recruitment, discipline, and promotion. “Automated
employment decision-making tool” does not include any software used
primarily for basic computerized processes, such as calculators, spell-check
tools, autocorrect functions, spreadsheets, electronic communications, or any
tool that relates only to internal office management, such as ordering office
supplies or processing payments, and that does not materially affect the rights,
liberties, benefits, safety, or welfare of any individual State employee.
(2) “State agency” means any agency, department, or division of the
State.
(b) Disclosure of automated employment decision-making tools. Any State
agency that utilizes automated employment decision-making tools shall
publish and maintain a list of the tools on the State agency’s website. The
disclosure shall include:
(1) a description of each automated employment decision-making tool
utilized by the State agency;
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 3 of 8
(2) the date the State agency began using each automated employment
decision-making tool;
(3) a summary of the purpose and use of each automated employment
decision-making tool; and
(4) any other information about the tools deemed relevant by the State
agency.
(c) Bargaining rights.
(1) The use of an automated employment decision-making tool by a
State agency shall not affect the rights of State employees pursuant to an
existing collective bargaining agreement or affect the existing bargaining
relationship between the State and employees covered by a collective
bargaining agreement.
(2) The use of an automated employment decision-making tool shall not
result in:
(A) the discharge, displacement, or loss of position, including partial
displacement such as a reduction in the hours of nonovertime work, wages, or
employment benefits, of State employees;
(B) the impairment of existing collective bargaining agreements; or
(C) the transfer of existing duties and functions currently performed
by employees of a State agency to an automated employment decision-making
tool.
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 4 of 8
(3) The use of an automated employment decision-making tool shall not
alter the rights, benefits, or privileges, including terms and conditions of
employment, classified service status, and collective bargaining unit
membership status, of all existing employees of a State agency, and the
collective bargaining unit membership status of all existing employees of a
State agency shall be preserved and protected.
Sec. 2. STUDY COMMITTEE ON AUTOMATED EMPLOYMENT
DECISION-MAKING TOOLS AND PUBLIC EMPLOYEES;
REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Study Committee on Automated
Employment Decision-Making Tools and Public Employees to examine the
impact of the disclosure of automated employment decision-making tools on
State employees and the feasibility of extending the disclosure requirement and
protections for unionized employees to municipal employees, teachers and
other public school employees, and employees of public institutions of higher
education.
(b) Membership. The Study Committee shall be composed of nine
members as follows:
(1) one current member of the House of Representatives, appointed by
the Speaker of the House;
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 5 of 8
(2) one current member of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on
Committees;
(3) one representative of the Department of Human Resources,
appointed by the Commissioner of Human Resources;
(4) one representative of the Agency of Administration, appointed by
the Secretary of Administration;
(5) one member who is a bargaining representative on behalf of State
employees, appointed by the Vermont State Employees’ Association;
(6) one representative of a statewide teachers’ union, appointed by the
Vermont-National Education Association;
(7) one representative of municipal employees, appointed by the
Vermont League of Cities and Towns;
(8) one representative of a public institution of higher education,
appointed jointly by the President of the University of Vermont and the
Chancellor of the Vermont State Colleges; and
(9) one public member with expertise in labor law or automated or
algorithmic decision making, appointed by the Governor.
(c) Powers and duties. The Study Committee shall examine and make
findings and recommendations regarding the following:
(1) the effectiveness of the disclosure requirements for automated
employment decision-making tools pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 269;
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 6 of 8
(2) the extent to which existing statutory and collectively bargained
employee protections adequately protect unionized State employees from
adverse employment actions resulting from the use of automated employment
decision-making tools;
(3) the interaction between automated employment decision-making
tools and the dispute resolution mechanisms in collective bargaining
agreements covering State employees;
(4) the feasibility, benefits, risks, and potential unintended consequences
of extending the disclosure and labor protection requirements of 3 V.S.A.
§ 269 to:
(A) municipal employees;
(B) teachers and other public school employees; and
(C) employees of public institutions of higher education;
(5) the administrative, fiscal, and operational impacts of extending
coverage under 3 V.S.A. §269 to additional categories of public employees;
and
(6) whether statutory amendments, phased implementation, or
differentiated approaches are advisable for different categories of public
employees.
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 7 of 8
(d) Assistance. The Study Committee shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Department of Human Resources. The
Joint Fiscal Office shall provide fiscal analysis upon request.
(e) Report. On or before December 15, 2028, the Study Committee shall
submit a written report to the House Committees on Commerce and Economic
Development and on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committees on Government Operations and on Education with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The committee member representing the Department of Human
Resources shall call the first meeting of the Study Committee to occur on or
before September 1, 2027.
(2) The members of the Study Committee shall select a chair from
among its legislative members at the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Study Committee shall cease to exist upon submission of its
report or on January 15, 2029, whichever occurs first.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Study Committee shall be entitled to per
diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23
VT LEG #386334 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.714
2026 Page 8 of 8
for not more than six meetings. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the General Assembly.
(2) Except for those members otherwise regularly employed by the
State, other members of the Study Committee shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than six meetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the Department of Human Resources.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386334 v.1